Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 42.2 Rhode Island Academy for Gifted and Talented Limited English Proficient Students

16-42.2-1.
Academy established.

There is created the Rhode Island academy for gifted and talented limited English proficient students within the department of elementary and secondary education, referred to as “the LEP Academy”. The role of the LEP Academy will be to offer the opportunity for uniquely challenging education for gifted and talented limited English proficient students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 272, § 1.

16-42.2-2.
Findings.

The general assembly has found and declares that:

Increasing numbers of limited English proficient students are entering Rhode Island public schools, and they must have equal access to gifted and talented programs;

That the state should encourage programs for gifted and talented students from among special populations, including LEP students;

That there is a special need to serve gifted and talented limited English proficient students in grades K through 12;

That the academy model has proven successful in other education approaches for meeting the needs of gifted and talented students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 272, § 1.

16-42.2-3.
Operations.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall:

Establish policies and procedures for the academy consistent with this chapter;

Carry out the following responsibilities:

Inform all school systems of the functions and funding of the academy;

Review and approve proposals submitted by local school systems;

Help to create new and productive approaches of providing direct services to meet the needs of LEP gifted and talented students;

Consult with the gifted and LEP state advisory committees on the operation of the academy program;

Assure that services funded under the academy’s auspices are direct and supplementary services to LEP gifted and talented students;

Monitor funded programs;

Report on progress of programs funded under the academy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 272, § 1.